Utah statutes.
54-13-4.   Inspection and examination of records and properties.

Officers, employees, or agents authorized by the commission, upon presenting appropriate credentials to the person in charge, may inspect and examine, at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner, the records and properties of any person engaged in intrastate pipeline transportation to the extent those records and properties are relevant to determining whether the person is acting in compliance with this chapter or rules under this chapter.

